District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.03

Firing ranges.

Any person operating a firing range in the District, shall in addition to any other requirement imposed by law, register with the Chief, on a form prescribed by him, which shall include the business name of the range, the location, the names and home addresses of the owners and principal officers, the types of weapons fired there, the number and types of weapons normally stored there, the days and hours of operation, and such other information as the Chief shall require.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 703, 23 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2373.
1973 Ed., § 6-1873.